Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4314
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Insurance may, after notice and hearing, adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of sections 44-4306 to 44-4314, 44-4319, and 44-4320.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 14.